Utah statutes.
4-22-2.   Utah Dairy Commission created -- Composition -- Elected members -- Terms of elected members -- Qualifications for election.

(1)  There is created an independent state agency known as the Utah Dairy Commission.

(2)  The Utah Dairy Commission consists of 13 members as follows:

(a)  the commissioner of agriculture and food, or the commissioner's representative;

(b)  the dean of the College of Agriculture at Utah State University, or the dean's representative;

(c)  the president of the Utah Dairy Women's Association or the president of the Utah Dairy Women's Association's representative;

(d)  a member from District 1, northern Cache County, which member shall have a Cornish, Lewiston, Richmond/Cove, or Trenton mailing address;

(e)  a member from District 2, central Cache County and Rich County, which member shall have a Newton, Clarkston, Amalga, Smithfield, Benson, Hyde Park, Mendon, or Petersboro mailing address;

(f)  a member from District 3, southern Cache County, which member shall have a Logan, Providence, Nibley, Hyrum, Paradise, Wellsville, College Ward, Young Ward, or Millville mailing address;

(g)  a member from District 4, Box Elder County;

(h)  a member from District 5, Weber and Morgan Counties;

(i)  a member from District 6, Salt Lake, Davis, Utah, and Tooele Counties;

(j)  a member from District 7, Wasatch, Summit, Duchesne, Uintah, and Daggett Counties;

(k)  a member from District 8, Millard, Beaver, Iron, and Washington Counties;

(l)  a member from District 9, Sanpete, Carbon, Emery, Grand, Juab, and San Juan Counties; and

(m)  a member from District 10, Piute, Wayne, Kane, Garfield, and Sevier Counties.

(3)  The ex officio members listed in Subsections (2)(a) and (b) shall serve without a vote.

(4)  The members listed in Subsections (2)(d) through (m) shall be elected to four-year terms of office as provided in Section 4-22-6.

(5)  Members shall enter office on July 1 of the year in which they are elected.

(6)  The commission, by two-thirds vote, may alter the boundaries comprising the districts established in this section to maintain equitable representation of active milk producers on the commission.

(7)  Each member shall be:

(a)  a citizen of the United States;

(b)  26 years of age or older;

(c)  an active milk producer with five consecutive years experience in milk production within this state immediately preceding election; and

(d)  a resident of Utah and the district represented.

